Utah statutes.
64-13d-104.   Use of force -- Private prison employees.

(1)  Employees of a facility contractor may use reasonable force to the extent allowed by state law.  The use of force, power, and authority shall be limited to:

(a)  the grounds of a facility operated in whole or in part by their employer;

(b)  when transporting inmates; and

(c)  when pursuing escapees from the facility.

(2)  Training standards for employees of a contractor shall be in accordance with the standards in Section 64-13-24.

(3)  Subsection (2) does not confer peace officer status on the contractor or its employees.



Enacted by Chapter 288, 1999 General Session

